Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1712
Initial payment, defined.

Initial payment shall mean the total amount a purchaser is obligated to pay under the terms of the seller-assisted marketing plan contract prior to or at the time of delivery of the equipment, supplies, products, or services or within six months of the purchaser commencing operation of the seller-assisted marketing plan. If the contract sets forth a specific total sale price for purchase of the seller-assisted marketing plan which total price is to be paid partially as a downpayment and then in specific monthly payments, the initial payment shall mean the entire total sale price.

Laws 1979, LB 180, § 12.